Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 4. Virginia Water Quality Improvement Fund.

§ 10.1-2127.1.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Fund”
means the Virginia Water Quality Improvement Fund established by §

10.1-2128

.

History.

2019, c. 533.

§ 10.1-2128.
Virginia Water Quality Improvement Fund established; purposes.

There is hereby established in the state treasury a special permanent, nonreverting fund, to be known as the “Virginia Water Quality Improvement Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. The Fund shall consist of sums appropriated to it by the General Assembly which shall include, unless otherwise provided in the general appropriation act, 10 percent of the annual general fund revenue collections that are in excess of the official estimates in the general appropriation act and 10 percent of any unrestricted and uncommitted general fund balance at the close of each fiscal year whose reappropriation is not required in the general appropriation act. The Fund shall also consist of such other sums as may be made available to it from any other source, public or private, and shall include any penalties or damages collected under this article, federal grants solicited and received for the specific purposes of the Fund, and all interest and income from investment of the Fund. Any sums remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. All moneys designated for the Fund shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for Water Quality Improvement Grants. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon the written request of the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality or the Director of the Department of Conservation and Recreation as provided in this chapter.

Except as otherwise provided under this article, the purpose of the Fund is to provide Water Quality Improvement Grants to local governments, soil and water conservation districts, state agencies, institutions of higher education and individuals for point and nonpoint source pollution prevention, reduction and control programs and efforts undertaken in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. The Fund shall not be used for agency operating expenses or for purposes of replacing or otherwise reducing any general, nongeneral, or special funds allocated or appropriated to any state agency; however, nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the award of a Water Quality Improvement Grant to a local government in connection with point or nonpoint pollution prevention, reduction and control programs or efforts undertaken on land owned by the Commonwealth and leased to the local government. In keeping with the purpose for which the Fund is created, it shall be the policy of the General Assembly to provide annually its share of financial support to qualifying applicants for grants in order to fulfill the Commonwealth’s responsibilities under Article XI of the Constitution of Virginia.

For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005, $50 million shall be appropriated from the general fund and deposited into the Fund. Except as otherwise provided under this article, such appropriation and any amounts appropriated to the Fund in subsequent years in addition to any amounts deposited to the Fund pursuant to the provisions of subsection A shall be used solely to finance the costs of design and installation of nutrient removal technology at publicly owned treatment works designated as significant dischargers or eligible nonsignificant dischargers for compliance with the effluent limitations for total nitrogen and total phosphorus of the Chesapeake Bay TMDL Watershed Implementation Plan or applicable regulatory or permit requirements. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the Governor and General Assembly may, at any time, provide additional funding for nonpoint source pollution reduction activities through the Fund in excess of the deposit required under subsection A.At such time as grant agreements specified in §

10.1-2130

have been signed by every significant discharger and eligible nonsignificant discharger and available funds are sufficient to implement the provisions of such grant agreements, the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations shall review the financial assistance provided under this section and determine (i) whether such deposits should continue to be made, (ii) the size of the deposit to be made, (iii) the programs and activities that should be financed by such deposits in the future, and (iv) whether the provisions of this section should be extended.

History.

1997, cc. 21, 625, 626; 1999, c. 257; 2001, c. 264; 2005, cc. 704, 707, 709; 2006, c. 236; 2008, cc. 278, 500, 643, 701; 2010, c. 684; 2015, c. 164.

Cross references.

As to assignment of general fund for nonrecurring expenditures, see § 2.2-1514. As to watershed general permit for nutrients, see § 62.1-44.19:14.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 704, 707, and 709, cl. 2 provides: “That the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations, the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Finance, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources and the Senate Committee on Finance, in consultation with the Secretary of Natural Resources and the Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry shall by November 30, 2005, develop recommendations for a permanent source of funding that will sufficiently and predictably generate the necessary revenue to fund the tributary strategy plans to remove the Chesapeake Bay and its tidal tributaries from the Clean Water Act section 303(d) list of impaired waters and to remove those waters located outside the Chesapeake Bay watershed from the impaired waters list.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 373 F, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “F.1. Out of the appropriation in this Item, $2,583,531 in the first year and $2,583,531 in the second year from the funds designated in Item 3-1.01.C. of this act are hereby appropriated to the Virginia Water Quality Improvement Fund and designated for deposit to the reserve fund established pursuant to paragraph B of Item 372. It is the intent of the General Assembly that all interest earnings of the Water Quality Improvement Fund shall be spent only upon appropriation by the General Assembly, after the recommendation of the Secretary of Natural Resources, pursuant to §

10.1-2129

, Code of Virginia.

“2. Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

10.1-2128

,

10.1-2129

and

10.1-2128

.1, Code of Virginia, it is the intent of the General Assembly that the department use interest earnings from the Water Quality Improvement Fund and the Virginia Natural Resources Commitment Fund to support one position to administer grants from the fund.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committee on Finance” in the second paragraph of subsection C. March 10, 2021.

The 1999 amendment,

effective March 18, 1999, inserted “institutions of higher education” in the first sentence of subsection B.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 264 added the language beginning “however, nothing in this section” to the end of subsection B.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 704, 707 and 709 are identical, and added the last sentence in subsection B, added subsection C, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 236, in subsection C, in the second sentence of the first paragraph, deleted “biological nutrient removal facilities or other” following “installation of” and inserted “or eligible nonsignificant dischargers,” and in the second paragraph, inserted “and eligible nonsignificant discharger.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 278 and 500 are nearly identical, and inserted “state agencies” in the first sentence in subsection B; and added the last sentence in subsection C.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 643 and 701 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “Except as otherwise provided under this article, the purpose” for “The purpose”; in subsection C, substituted “Except as othewise provided under this article, such appropriation” for “This appropriation”, and deleted “of §

10.1-2128

” preceding “shall be used solely.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 684 substituted “unrestricted and uncommitted” for “unreserved” in the third sentence of subsection A.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 164 substituted “of the Chesapeake Bay TMDL Watershed Improvement Plan or applicable regulatory or permit requirements” for “as required by the tributary strategy plans or applicable regulatory requirements” in subsection C.

Law Review.

For article, “Checking in on the Chesapeake: Some Questions of Design,” see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1131 (2006).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Environmental Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 383 (2007).

§ 10.1-2128.1.
Virginia Natural Resources Commitment Fund established.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Virginia Natural Resources Commitment Fund hereafter referred to as “the Subfund,” which shall be a subfund of the Virginia Water Quality Improvement Fund and administered by the Department of Conservation and Recreation. The Subfund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All amounts appropriated and such other funds as may be made available to the Subfund from any other source, public or private, shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Subfund. Interest earned on moneys in the Subfund shall remain in the Subfund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Subfund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Subfund. Moneys in the Subfund shall be used as provided in subsection B solely for the Virginia Agricultural Best Management Practices Cost-Share Program administered by the Department of Conservation and Recreation.

Beginning on July 1, 2008, and continuing in each subsequent fiscal year until July 1, 2018, out of such amounts as may be appropriated and deposited to the Subfund, distributions shall be made in each fiscal year for the following purposes:

Eight percent of the total amount distributed to the Virginia Agricultural Best Management Practices Cost-Share Program shall be distributed to soil and water conservation districts to provide technical assistance for the implementation of such agricultural best management practices. Each soil and water conservation district in the Commonwealth shall receive a share according to a method employed by the Director of the Department of Conservation and Recreation in consultation with the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, that accounts for the percentage of the available agricultural best management practices funding that will be received by the district from the Subfund;

Fifty-five percent of the total amount distributed to the Virginia Agricultural Best Management Practices Cost-Share Program shall be used for matching grants for agricultural best management practices on lands in the Commonwealth exclusively or partly within the Chesapeake Bay watershed; and

Thirty-seven percent of the total amount distributed to the Virginia Agricultural Best Management Practices Cost-Share Program shall be used for matching grants for agricultural best management practices on lands in the Commonwealth exclusively outside of the Chesapeake Bay watershed.

The Department of Conservation and Recreation, in consultation with stakeholders, including representatives of the agricultural community, the conservation community, and the Soil and Water Conservation Districts, shall determine an annual funding amount for effective Soil and Water Conservation District technical assistance and implementation of agricultural best management practices pursuant to §

10.1-546.1

. Pursuant to § 2.2-1504, the Department shall provide to the Governor the annual funding amount needed for each year of the ensuing biennial period. The Department shall include the annual funding amount as part of the reporting requirements in § 62.1-44.118.

History.

2008, cc. 643, 701; 2009, cc. 209, 263; 2011, c. 245.

Cross references.

As to assignment of general fund for nonrecurring expenditures, see § 2.2-1514.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 373 F, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “F.1. Out of the appropriation in this Item, $2,583,531 in the first year and $2,583,531 in the second year from the funds designated in Item 3-1.01.C. of this act are hereby appropriated to the Virginia Water Quality Improvement Fund and designated for deposit to the reserve fund established pursuant to paragraph B of Item 372. It is the intent of the General Assembly that all interest earnings of the Water Quality Improvement Fund shall be spent only upon appropriation by the General Assembly, after the recommendation of the Secretary of Natural Resources, pursuant to §

10.1-2129

, Code of Virginia.

“2. Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

10.1-2128

,

10.1-2129

and

10.1-2128

.1, Code of Virginia, it is the intent of the General Assembly that the department use interest earnings from the Water Quality Improvement Fund and the Virginia Natural Resources Commitment Fund to support one position to administer grants from the fund.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item § 3-6.01, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “There is hereby assessed a twenty dollar fee on (i) every deed for which the state recordation tax is collected pursuant to §§

58.1-801

A and

58.1-803

, Code of Virginia; and (ii) every certificate of satisfaction admitted under §

55.1-345

, Code of Virginia. The revenue generated from fifty percent of such fee shall be deposited to the general fund. The revenue generated from the other fifty percent of such fee shall be deposited to the Virginia Natural Resources Commitment Fund, a subfund of the Virginia Water Quality Improvement Fund, as established in §

10.1-2128.1

, Code of Virginia. The funds deposited to this subfund shall be disbursed for the agricultural best management practices cost share program, pursuant to §

10.1-2128.1

, Code of Virginia.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 209 and 263 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “as provided in subsection B solely for the Virginia Agricultural Best Management Practices Cost-Share Program administered by the Department of Conservation and Recreation” for “solely for the purposes as described in subsection B” in the last sentence; in subdivision B 1, substituted “Eight” for “Five” and inserted “Virginia” preceding “Agricultural Best Management” in the first sentence, substituted “Subfund” for “Virginia Natural Resource Commitment Fund” at the end; in subdivision B 2, substituted “Fifty-five” for “Fifty-seven,” inserted “Virginia” and substituted “lands in the Commonwealth exclusively or partly” for “lands exclusively”; in subdivision B 3, substituted “Thirty-seven” for “Thirty-eight,” inserted “Virginia,” substituted “on lands in the Commonwealth exclusively” for “on all other lands” and deleted “in the Commonwealth” from the end; and added subsection C.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 245 rewrote the last sentence in subsection C, which read: “The Department shall report the annual funding amount to the Chairmen of the House Appropriations and Senate Finance Committees by October 15 of each year.”

§ 10.1-2128.2.
Nutrient Offset Fund; purposes.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Nutrient Offset Fund, referred to in this section as “the Subfund,” which shall be a subfund of the Virginia Water Quality Improvement Fund and administered by the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality. The Subfund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All amounts appropriated and such other moneys as may be made available to the Subfund from any other source, public or private, shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Subfund. Interest earned on moneys in the Subfund shall remain in the Subfund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Subfund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Subfund. Moneys in the Subfund shall be used solely for the purposes stated in subsection B. Expenditures and disbursements from the Subfund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request of the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality.

The Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall use moneys in the Subfund only to acquire nutrient credits or allocations from point or nonpoint sources that achieve equivalent point or nonpoint source reductions in the same tributary beyond those reductions already required by or funded under federal or state law or the Watershed Implementation Plan prepared for the Chesapeake Bay Total Maximum Daily Load pursuant to § 2.2-218. The Director of the Department of Environmental Quality may enter into long-term contracts with producers of nutrient credits to purchase such credits using moneys from the Subfund. Credits in the Subfund shall be listed in a registry maintained by the Department of Environmental Quality.

The Department of Environmental Quality shall establish a procedure to govern the distribution of moneys from the Subfund that shall include criteria that address (i) the annualized cost per pound of the reduction, (ii) the reliability of the underlying technology or practice, (iii) the relative durability and permanence of the credits generated, and (iv) other such factors that the Department deems appropriate to ensure that the practices will achieve the necessary reduction in nutrients for the term of credit.

The Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall make nutrient credits acquired pursuant to subsection B available for sale to owners or operators of new or expanded facilities pursuant to § 62.1-44.19:15, and to permitted facilities pursuant to § 62.1-44.19:18. The Director shall consider recommendations of the Secretary of Commerce and Trade consistent with the requirements of the State Water Control Law (§ 62.1-44.2 et seq.) in the sale of nutrient credits to new or expanding private facilities.

For the purposes of this section, a “nutrient credit” means a nutrient reduction certified by the Department of Environmental Quality as a load allocation, point or nonpoint source nitrogen credit, or point or nonpoint source phosphorus credit under the Chesapeake Bay Watershed Nutrient Credit Exchange Program (§ 62.1-44.19:12 et seq.).

History.

2011, c. 524; 2017, c. 540.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 540 substituted “referred to in this section” for “hereafter referred to” in the first sentence of subsection A; rewrote subsection B, which read: “The Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall use moneys in the Subfund only to purchase nutrient offsets that achieve equivalent point or nonpoint source reductions in the same tributary beyond those reductions already required by or funded under federal or state law. The Director of the Department of Environmental Quality may enter into long-term contracts with producers of nutrient offsets to purchase such offsets using moneys from the Subfund. Priority shall be given to nutrient offsets produced from facilities that generate electricity from animal waste”; inserted subsection C and redesignated remaining subsections accordingly; in subsection D, substituted “credits acquired” for “offsets purchased” in the first sentence, and added the second sentence; in subsection E, substituted “nutrient credit” for “nutrient offset” and inserted “or nonpoint” after “point” twice.

§ 10.1-2129.
Agency coordination; conditions of grants.

If, in any fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2005, there are appropriations to the Fund in addition to those made pursuant to subsection A of §

10.1-2128

, the Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources shall distribute those moneys in the Fund provided from the 10 percent of the annual general fund revenue collections that are in excess of the official estimates in the general appropriation act, and the 10 percent of any unrestricted and uncommitted general fund balance at the close of each fiscal year whose reappropriation is not required in the general appropriation act, as follows:

Seventy percent of the moneys shall be distributed to the Department of Conservation and Recreation and shall be administered by it for the sole purpose of implementing projects or best management practices that reduce nitrogen and phosphorus nonpoint source pollution, with a priority given to agricultural best management practices. In no single year shall more than 60 percent of the moneys be used for projects or practices exclusively within the Chesapeake Bay watershed; and

Thirty percent of the moneys shall be distributed to the Department of Environmental Quality, which shall use such moneys for making grants for the sole purpose of designing and installing nutrient removal technologies for publicly owned treatment works designated as significant dischargers or eligible nonsignificant dischargers. The moneys shall also be available for grants when the design and installation of nutrient removal technology utilizes the Public-Private Education Facilities and Infrastructure Act (§ 56-575.1 et seq.).

Except as otherwise provided in the Appropriation Act, in any fiscal year when moneys are not appropriated to the Fund in addition to those specified in subsection A of §

10.1-2128

, or when moneys appropriated to the Fund in addition to those specified in subsection A of §

10.1-2128

are less than 40 percent of those specified in subsection A of § 10.1-2128, the Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources, in consultation with the Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry, the State Forester, the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services, and the Directors of the Departments of Environmental Quality and Conservation and Recreation, and with the advice and guidance of the Board of Conservation and Recreation, the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, and the State Water Control Board, and following a public comment period of at least 30 days and a public hearing, shall allocate those moneys deposited in the Fund, but excluding any moneys deposited into the Virginia Natural Resources Commitment Fund established pursuant to §

10.1-2128.1

, between point and nonpoint sources, both of which shall receive moneys in each such year.

Except as may otherwise be specified in the general appropriation act, the Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources, in consultation with the Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry, the State Forester, the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services, the State Health Commissioner, and the Directors of the Departments of Environmental Quality and Conservation and Recreation, and with the advice and guidance of the Board of Conservation and Recreation, the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, and the State Water Control Board, shall develop written guidelines that (i) specify eligibility requirements; (ii) govern the application for and the distribution and conditions of Water Quality Improvement Grants; (iii) list criteria for prioritizing funding requests; and (iv) define criteria and financial incentives for water reuse.
B. 1. Except as may otherwise be specified in the general appropriation act, the Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources, in consultation with the Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry, the State Forester, the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services, the State Health Commissioner, and the Directors of the Departments of Environmental Quality and Conservation and Recreation, and with the advice and guidance of the Board of Conservation and Recreation, the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, and the State Water Control Board, shall develop written guidelines that (i) specify eligibility requirements; (ii) govern the application for and the distribution and conditions of Water Quality Improvement Grants; (iii) list criteria for prioritizing funding requests; and (iv) define criteria and financial incentives for water reuse.

In developing the guidelines, the Secretary shall evaluate and consider, in addition to such other factors as may be appropriate to most effectively restore, protect and improve the quality of state waters: (i) specific practices and programs proposed in the Chesapeake Bay TMDL Watershed Implementation Plan, and the associated effectiveness and cost per pound of nutrients removed; (ii) water quality impairment or degradation caused by different types of nutrients released in different locations from different sources; and (iii) environmental benchmarks and indicators for achieving improved water quality. The process for development of guidelines pursuant to this subsection shall, at a minimum, include (a) use of an advisory committee composed of interested parties; (b) a 60-day public comment period on draft guidelines; (c) written responses to all comments received; and (d) notice of the availability of draft guidelines and final guidelines to all who request such notice.

In addition to those the Secretary deems advisable to most effectively restore, protect and improve the quality of state waters, the criteria for prioritizing funding requests shall include: (i) the pounds of total nitrogen and the pounds of total phosphorus reduced by the project; (ii) whether the location of the water quality restoration, protection or improvement project or program is within a watershed or subwatershed with documented water nutrient loading problems or adopted nutrient reduction goals; (iii) documented water quality impairment; and (iv) the availability of other funding mechanisms. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection E of §

10.1-2131

, the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality may approve a local government point source grant application request for any single project that exceeds the authorized grant amount outlined in subsection E of §

10.1-2131

. Whenever a local government applies for a grant that exceeds the authorized grant amount outlined in this chapter or when there is no stated limitation on the amount of the grant for which an application is made, the Directors and the Secretary shall consider the comparative revenue capacity, revenue efforts and fiscal stress as reported by the Commission on Local Government. The development or implementation of cooperative programs developed pursuant to subsection B of §

10.1-2127

shall be given a high priority in the distribution of Virginia Water Quality Improvement Grants from the moneys allocated to nonpoint source pollution.

History.

1997, cc. 21, 625, 626; 1999, c. 509; 2005, cc. 41, 704, 707, 709; 2006, c. 236; 2008, cc. 643, 701; 2010, c. 684; 2011, c. 189; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2015, c. 164; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 401.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 41, cl. 4 provides: “That references to the Chesapeake Bay Local Assistance Department in regulation, local ordinance, guidance, or otherwise shall mean the Department of Conservation and Recreation, and similarly, references to the Executive Director of the Chesapeake Bay Local Assistance Department shall mean the Director of the Department of Conservation and Recreation.”

Acts 2005, c. 41, cl. 5 provides: “That the Chesapeake Bay Local Assistance Board shall have the authority to amend, modify, or delete provisions in the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Area Designation and Management Regulations (9-VAC 10-20 et seq.) in order to implement Chapter 372 of the Acts of Assembly of 2004 and the provisions of this act. Those amendments to the regulations necessitated by these acts shall be exempt from Article 2 (§ 2.2-4006 et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act.”

Acts 2005, cc. 704, 707, and 709, cl. 2 provides: “That the Chairmen of the House Committee on Appropriations, the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Finance, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources and the Senate Committee on Finance, in consultation with the Secretary of Natural Resources and the Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry shall by November 30, 2005, develop recommendations for a permanent source of funding that will sufficiently and predictably generate the necessary revenue to fund the tributary strategy plans to remove the Chesapeake Bay and its tidal tributaries from the Clean Water Act section 303(d) list of impaired waters and to remove those waters located outside the Chesapeake Bay watershed from the impaired waters list.”

Acts 2012, cc. 785 and 819, cl. 3 provides: “That the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Area Designation and Management Regulations (9 VAC 10-20) shall be transferred from the Chesapeake Bay Local Assistance Board to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board on July 1, 2012, and the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board may amend, modify, or delete provisions in these regulations in order to implement this Act. Current regulations that are in effect shall remain in full force and effect until altered, amended, or rescinded by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board.”

Acts 2012, cc. 785 and 819, cl. 4 provides: “That any program determinations of, or enforcement actions initiated by, the Chesapeake Bay Local Assistance Board shall be assumed by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board and shall remain in effect until altered, amended, or rescinded by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 373 B 1, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “B.1. Notwithstanding §

10.1-2129

A., Code of Virginia, $46,315,697 the first year from the general fund shall be deposited to the Virginia Water Quality Improvement Fund established under the Water Quality Improvement Act of 1997. Of this amount in the first year, $2,250,000 shall be appropriated to the Department for the following specified statewide uses: $500,000 shall be used for the Commonwealth’s match for participation in the Federal Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (CREP); $500,000 shall be transferred to the Virginia Association of Soil and Water Conservation Districts to be used for the Virginia Conservation Assistance Program (VCAP); $750,000 shall be allocated for special nonpoint source reduction projects to include, but not be limited to, poultry litter transport and grants related to the development and certification of Resource Management Plans developed pursuant to §

10.1-104.7

; $250,000 shall be transferred to the Department of Forestry for water quality grants; and $250,000 to the Department for the development and continued maintenance of the Conservation Application Suite including costs related to servers and necessary software licenses. The Department of Forestry shall submit a report by August 15, 2020, to the Department of Conservation and Recreation specifying uses of funds received. Pursuant to paragraph B of Item 372, $4,857,829 is designated for deposit to the reserve within the Virginia Water Quality Improvement Fund.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 373 F, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “F.1. Out of the appropriation in this Item, $2,583,531 in the first year and $2,583,531 in the second year from the funds designated in Item 3-1.01.C. of this act are hereby appropriated to the Virginia Water Quality Improvement Fund and designated for deposit to the reserve fund established pursuant to paragraph B of Item 372. It is the intent of the General Assembly that all interest earnings of the Water Quality Improvement Fund shall be spent only upon appropriation by the General Assembly, after the recommendation of the Secretary of Natural Resources, pursuant to §

10.1-2129

, Code of Virginia.

“2. Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

10.1-2128

,

10.1-2129

and

10.1-2128

.1, Code of Virginia, it is the intent of the General Assembly that the department use interest earnings from the Water Quality Improvement Fund and the Virginia Natural Resources Commitment Fund to support one position to administer grants from the fund.”

The 1999 amendment,

rewrote former subsection A as the present subsections A and B, former subsection A read: “Except as may otherwise be specified in the general appropriation act, the Secretary of Natural Resources, in consultation with the State Forester and the Directors of the Departments of Environmental Quality and Conservation and Recreation and of the Chesapeake Bay Local Assistance Department and with the advice and guidance of the Board of Conservation and Recreation, the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, the State Water Control Board, and the Chesapeake Bay Local Assistance Board, shall (i) allocate moneys in the Fund between point and nonpoint source pollution, and (ii) develop written guidelines for the distribution and conditions of Water Quality Improvement Grants and criteria for prioritizing funding requests. In developing the guidelines the Secretary shall evaluate and consider, in addition to such other factors as may be appropriate: (i) specific practices and programs proposed in any tributary plan required by Article 2 (§ 2.1-51.12:1 et seq.) of Chapter 5.1 of Title 2.1, and the associated effectiveness and cost per pound of nutrients removed; (ii) water quality impairment or degradation caused by different types of nutrients released in different locations from different sources; and (iii) environmental benchmarks and indicators for achieving improved water quality. The guidelines shall include procedures for soliciting applications for funding and shall ensure that both point and nonpoint source pollution are equitably addressed and funded in each year”; redesignated former subsection B as the present concluding paragraph of present subsection B, and inserted “to most effectively restore, protect and improve the quality of state waters” in the first sentence.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 41 deleted “Chesapeake Bay Local Assistance Department” in subsections A and B.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 704, 707, and 709, are identical, and rewrote subsection A; redesignated former subsection B as subdivisions B 1 through B 3; in subdivision B 1, inserted “Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry, the” preceding “State Forester,” “the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services” preceding “and the Directors,” and deleted “and of the Chesapeake Bay Local Assistance Department” preceding “and with the advice and guidance”; in subdivision B 2, inserted “strategy” preceding “plan,” deleted “required by §§ 2.2-218 through 2.2-220” preceding “and the associated,” substituted “(a), (b), (c), and (d)” for the second set of clauses “(i), (ii), (iii), and (iv)”; rewrote subdivision B 3; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 236, in subdivision A 2, deleted “state of the art” preceding “nutrient removal” in the first and second sentences and inserted “or eligible nonsignificant dischargers” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 643 and 701 are identical, and inserted “but excluding any moneys deposited into the Virginia Natural Resources Commitment Fund established pursuant to §

10.1-2128.1

” in the last sentence of subdivision A 3.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 684 substituted “unrestricted and uncommitted” for “unreserved” in the introductory language of subsection A.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 189, in subdivision B 1, inserted “the State Health Commissioner” and added clause (iv) and made a related change.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 785 and 819 are identical, and deleted “the Chesapeake Bay Local Assistance Board” in subdivisions A 3 and B 1, and made related changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 164 substituted “the Chesapeake Bay TMDL Watershed Implementation Plan” for “any tributary strategy plan” in subdivision B 2.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 401, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, introductory language and subdivision A 3 and in subsection B, introductory language, inserted “and Historic.”

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Environmental Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 383 (2007).

§ 10.1-2130.
General provisions related to grants from the Fund.

All Water Quality Improvement Grants shall be governed by a legally binding and enforceable grant agreement between the recipient and the granting agency. In addition to provisions providing for payment of the total amount of the grant, the agreement shall, at a minimum, also contain provisions that govern design and installation and require proper long-term operation, monitoring and maintenance of funded projects, including design and performance criteria, as well as contractual or stipulated penalties in an amount sufficient to ensure compliance with the agreement, which may include repayment with interest, for any breach of the agreement, including failure to properly operate, monitor or maintain. Grant agreements shall be made available for public review and comment for a period of no less than thirty days but no more than sixty days prior to execution. The granting agency shall cause notice of a proposed grant agreement to be given to all applicants for Water Quality Improvement Grants whose applications are then pending and to any person requesting such notice.

History.

1997, cc. 21, 625, 626; 1999, c. 509.

The 1999 amendment

added “and to any person requesting such notice” at the end of the paragraph.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Technical assistance grant related to nutrient reduction. —

Subsection C of §

10.1-2131

does not authorize the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality to issue a technical assistance grant related to nutrient reduction without the notice and the public review and comment period required by this section. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Christopher K. Peace, Member, House of Delegates, 08-077, 2008 Va. AG LEXIS 45 (12/11/08).